Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.160

Strip, body cavity searches—Physical examinations for public health purposes excluded.

Physical examinations conducted by licensed medical professionals solely for public health purposes under separate statutory authority shall not be considered searches for purposes of RCW 10.79.120, 10.79.130, and 10.79.140.

[ 1986 c 88 s 5.]